Utah statutes.
62A-5b-104.   Right to be accompanied by service animal -- Security deposits
-- Discrimination -- Liability -- Identification.
(1) (a)  A person with a disability has the right to be accompanied by a
service animal, unless the service animal is a danger or nuisance to others as
interpreted under the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C.
12102:
(i)  in any of the places specified in Section 62A-5b-103; and
(ii)  without additional charge for the service animal.
(b)  This section does not prohibit an owner or lessor of private housing
accommodations from charging a person, including a person with a disability, a
reasonable deposit as security for any damage or wear and tear that might be
caused by a service animal if the owner or lessor would charge a similar
deposit to other persons for potential wear and tear.
(c)  An owner or lessor of private housing accommodations may not, in any
manner, discriminate against a person with a disability on the basis of the
person's possession of a service animal.
(2)  A person who is not a person with a disability has the right to be
accompanied by an animal that is in training to become a service animal:
(a)  in any of the places specified in Section 62A-5b-103; and
(b)  without additional charge for the animal.
(3)  A person with a disability is liable for any loss or damage caused or
inflicted to the premises by the person's service animal.
(4)  A person accompanied by a service animal is encouraged to identify the
animal by exhibiting one or more of the following:
(a)  the animal's laminated identification card;
(b)  the animal's service vest; or
(c)  another form of identification.
